Connecticut, session 2026, SB00100.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-700 of the general statutes be amended to reduce the
two lowest marginal rates for the personal income tax from (1) two per
cent to zero, and (2) from four and one-half per cent to three per cent,
for taxpayers with adjusted gross income of less than one hundred
thousand dollars for single filers and less than two hundred thousand
dollars for married individuals filing jointly.